California statutes. Labor Code
(a) That an injured person claiming to be an employee was an independent contractor or otherwise excluded from the protection of this division where there is proof that the injured person was at the time of his or her injury actually performing service for the alleged employer.

(b) Intoxication of an employee causing his or her injury.

(c) Willful misconduct of an employee causing his or her injury.

(d) Aggravation of disability by unreasonable conduct of the employee.

(e) Prejudice to the employer by failure of the employee to give notice, as required by Sections 5400 and 5401.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 4, Sec. 9.   Effective April 3, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

5706.

Where it is represented to the appeals board, either before or after the filing of an application, that an employee has died as a result of injuries sustained in the course of his employment, the appeals board may require an autopsy. The report of the physician performing the autopsy may be received in evidence in any proceedings theretofore or thereafter brought. If at the time the autopsy is requested, the body of the employee is in the custody of the coroner, the coroner shall, upon the request of the appeals board or of any party interested, afford reasonable opportunity for the attendance of any physicians named by the appeals board at any autopsy ordered by him. If the coroner does not require, or has already performed the autopsy, he shall permit an autopsy or reexamination to be performed by physicians named by the appeals board. No fee shall be charged by the coroner for any service, arrangement, or permission given by him.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1513.)
-------------------------------------------

5707.

If the body of a deceased employee is not in the custody of the coroner, the appeals board may authorize the performance of such autopsy and, if necessary, the exhumation of the body therefor. If the dependents, or a majority thereof, of any such deceased employee, having the custody of the body refuse to allow the autopsy, it shall not be performed. In such case, upon the hearing of any application for compensation it is a disputable presumption that the injury or death was not due to causes entitling the claimants to benefits under this division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1513.)
-------------------------------------------

5708.

All hearings and investigations before the appeals board or a workers’ compensation judge are governed by this division and by the rules of practice and procedures adopted by the appeals board. In the conduct thereof they shall not be bound by the common law or statutory rules of evidence and procedure, but may make inquiry in the manner, through oral testimony and records, which is best calculated to ascertain the substantial rights of the parties and carry out justly the spirit and provisions of this division. All oral testimony, objections, and rulings shall be taken down in shorthand by a competent phonographic reporter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 326, Sec. 25.)
-------------------------------------------

5709.

No informality in any proceeding or in the manner of taking testimony shall invalidate any order, decision, award, or rule made and filed as specified in this division. No order, decision, award, or rule shall be invalidated because of the admission into the record, and use as proof of any fact in dispute, of any evidence not admissible under the common law or statutory rules of evidence and procedure.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1951, Ch. 778.)
-------------------------------------------

5710.

(a) The appeals board, a workers’ compensation judge, or any party to the action or proceeding, may, in any investigation or hearing before the appeals board, cause the deposition of witnesses residing within or without the state to be taken in the manner prescribed by law for like depositions in civil actions in the superior courts of this state under Title 4 (commencing with Section 2016.010) of Part 4 of the Code of Civil Procedure. To that end the attendance of witnesses and the production of records may be required. Depositions may be taken outside the state before any officer authorized to administer oaths. The appeals board or a workers’ compensation judge in any proceeding before the appeals board may cause evidence to be taken in other jurisdictions before the agency authorized to hear workers’ compensation matters in
 those other jurisdictions.

(b) If the employer or insurance carrier requests a deposition to be taken of an injured employee, or any person claiming benefits as a dependent of an injured employee, the deponent is entitled to receive in addition to all other benefits:

(1) All reasonable expenses of transportation, meals, and lodging incident to the deposition.

(2) Reimbursement for any loss of wages incurred during attendance at the deposition.

(3) One copy of the transcript of the deposition, without cost.

(4) A reasonable allowance for attorney’s fees for the deponent, if represented by an attorney licensed by the State Bar of this state. The fee shall be discretionary with, and, if
 allowed, shall be set by, the appeals board, but shall be paid by the employer or his or her insurer. The administrative director shall, on or before July 1, 2018, determine the range of reasonable fees to be paid.

(5) If interpretation services are required because the injured employee or deponent does not proficiently speak or understand the English language, upon a request from either, the employer shall pay for the services of a language interpreter certified or deemed certified pursuant to Article 8 (commencing with Section 11435.05) of Chapter 4.5 of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of, or Section 68566 of, the Government Code. The fee to be paid by the employer shall be in accordance with the fee schedule adopted by the administrative director
 and shall include any other deposition-related events as permitted by the administrative director.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 868, Sec. 11.   (SB 1160)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 6. Findings and Awards [5800. - 5816.]

5800.

All awards of the appeals board either for the payment of compensation or for the payment of death benefits, shall carry interest at the same rate as judgments in civil actions on all due and unpaid payments from the date of the making and filing of said award. Such interest shall run from the date of making and filing of an award, as to amounts which by the terms of the award are payable forthwith. As to amounts which under the terms of the award subsequently become due in installments or otherwise, such interest shall run from the date when each such amount becomes due and payable.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1513.)
-------------------------------------------

5800.5.

The 30-day period specified in Section 5313, shall run from the date of the submission of the application for decision and the provisions requiring the decision within such 30-day period shall be deemed mandatory and not merely directive.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1953, Ch. 1256.)
-------------------------------------------

5801.

The appeals board in its award may fix and determine the total amount of compensation to be paid and specify the manner of payment, or may fix and determine the weekly disability payment to be made and order payment thereof during the continuance of disability.

In the event the injured employee or the dependent of a deceased employee prevails in any petition by the employer for a writ of review from an award of the appeals board and the reviewing court finds that there is no reasonable basis for the petition, it shall remand the cause to the appeals board for the purpose of making a supplemental award awarding to the injured employee or his attorney, or the dependent of a deceased employee or his attorney a reasonable attorney’s fee for services rendered in connection with the petition for writ of review. Any such fee shall be in addition to the amount of compensation otherwise recoverable and shall be paid as part of the award by the party liable to pay such award.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1513.)
-------------------------------------------

5802.

If, in any proceeding under this division, it is proved that an injury has been suffered for which the employer would be liable to pay compensation if disability had resulted therefrom, but it is not proved that any disability has resulted, the appeals board may, instead of dismissing the application, award a nominal disability indemnity, if it appears that disability is likely to result at a future time.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1513.)
-------------------------------------------

5803.

The appeals board has continuing jurisdiction over all its orders, decisions, and awards made and entered under the provisions of this division, and the decisions and orders of the rehabilitation unit established under Section 139.5. At any time, upon notice and after an opportunity to be heard is given to the parties in interest, the appeals board may rescind, alter, or amend any order, decision, or award, good cause appearing therefor.

This power includes the right to review, grant or regrant, diminish, increase, or terminate, within the limits prescribed by this division, any compensation awarded, upon the grounds that the disability of the person in whose favor the award was made has either recurred, increased, diminished, or terminated.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 922, Sec. 16.)
-------------------------------------------

5803.5.

Any conviction pursuant to Section 1871.4 of the Insurance Code that materially affects the basis of any order, decision, or award of the appeals board shall be sufficient grounds for a reconsideration of that order, decision, or award.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 116, Sec. 33.)
-------------------------------------------

5804.

No award of compensation shall be rescinded, altered, or amended after five years from the date of the injury except upon a petition by a party in interest filed within such five years and any counterpetition seeking other relief filed by the adverse party within 30 days of the original petition raising issues in addition to those raised by such original petition. Provided, however, that after an award has been made finding that there was employment and the time to petition for a rehearing or reconsideration or review has expired or such petition if made has been determined, the appeals board upon a petition to reopen shall not have the power to find that there was no employment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1513.)
-------------------------------------------

5805.

Any order, decision, or award rescinding, altering or amending a prior order, decision, or award shall have the effect herein provided for original orders, decisions, and awards.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 90.)
-------------------------------------------

5806.

Any party affected thereby may file a certified copy of the findings and order, decision, or award of the appeals board with the clerk of the superior court of any county. Judgment shall be entered immediately by the clerk in conformity therewith. The words “any party affected thereby” include the Uninsured Employers Fund. In any case in which the findings and order, decision, or award of the appeals board is against an employer that has failed to secure the payment of compensation, the State of California on behalf of the Uninsured Employers Fund shall be entitled to have judgment entered not only against the employer, but also against any person found to be parents or substantial shareholders under Section 3717.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1226, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

5807.

The certified copy of the findings and order, decision, or award of the appeals board and a copy of the judgment constitute the judgment-roll. The pleadings, all orders of the appeals board, its original findings and order, decision, or award, and all other papers and documents filed in the cause shall remain on file in the office of the appeals board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1513.)
-------------------------------------------

5808.

The appeals board or a member thereof may stay the execution of any judgment entered upon an order, decision, or award of the appeals board, upon good cause appearing therefor and may impose the terms and conditions of the stay of execution. A certified copy of such order shall be filed with the clerk entering judgment. Where it is desirable to stay the enforcement of an order, decision, or award and a certified copy thereof and of the findings has not been issued, the appeals board or a member thereof may order the certified copy to be withheld with the same force and under the same conditions as it might issue a stay of execution if the certified copy had been issued and judgment entered thereon.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1513.)
-------------------------------------------

5809.

When a judgment is satisfied in fact, otherwise than upon an execution, the appeals board may, upon motion of either party or of its own motion, order the entry of satisfaction of the judgment. The clerk shall enter satisfaction of judgment only upon the filing of a certified copy of such order.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1513.)
-------------------------------------------

5810.

The orders, findings, decisions, or awards of the appeals board made and entered under this division may be reviewed by the courts specified in Sections 5950 to 5956 within the time and in the manner therein specified and not otherwise.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1513.)
-------------------------------------------

5811.

(a) No fees shall be charged by the clerk of any court for the performance of any official service required by this division, except for the docketing of awards as judgments and for certified copies of transcripts thereof. In all proceedings under this division before the appeals board, costs as between the parties may be allowed by the appeals board.

(b) (1) It shall be the responsibility of any party producing a witness requiring an interpreter to arrange for the presence of a qualified interpreter.

(2) A qualified interpreter is a language interpreter who is certified, or deemed certified, pursuant to Article 8 (commencing with Section 11435.05) of Chapter 4.5 of Part 1 of
 Division 3 of Title 2 of, or Section 68566 of, the Government Code. The duty of an interpreter is to accurately and impartially translate oral communications and transliterate written materials, and not to act as an agent or advocate. An interpreter shall not disclose to any person who is not an immediate participant in the communications the content of the conversations or documents that the interpreter has interpreted or transliterated unless the disclosure is compelled by court order. An attempt by any party or attorney to obtain disclosure is a bad faith tactic that is subject to Section 5813.

Interpreter fees that are reasonably, actually, and necessarily incurred shall be paid by the employer under this section, provided they are in accordance with the fee schedule adopted by the administrative director.

A qualified interpreter may render services during the following:

(A) A deposition.

(B) An appeals board hearing.

(C) A medical treatment appointment or medical-legal examination.

(D) During those settings which the administrative director determines are reasonably necessary to ascertain the validity or extent of injury to an employee who does not proficiently speak or understand the English language.

(c) The administrative director shall promulgate regulations establishing criteria to verify the identity and credentials of individuals who provide interpreter services in all necessary settings and proceedings within the workers’ compensation system. Those regulations shall be adopted no later than January 1, 2018.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 868, Sec. 12.   (SB 1160)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

5813.

(a) The workers’ compensation referee or appeals board may order a party, the party’s attorney, or both, to pay any reasonable expenses, including attorney’s fees and costs, incurred by another party as a result of bad-faith actions or tactics that are frivolous or solely intended to cause unnecessary delay. In addition, a workers’ compensation referee or the appeals board, in its sole discretion, may order additional sanctions not to exceed two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) to be transmitted to the General Fund.

(b) The determination of sanctions shall be made after written application by the party seeking sanctions or upon the appeal board’s own motion.

(c) This section shall apply to all applications for adjudication that are filed on or after January 1, 1994.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1242, Sec. 41.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

5814.

(a) When payment of compensation has been unreasonably delayed or refused, either prior to or subsequent to the issuance of an award, the amount of the payment unreasonably delayed or refused shall be increased up to 25 percent or up to ten thousand dollars ($10,000), whichever is less. In any proceeding under this section, the appeals board shall use its discretion to accomplish a fair balance and substantial justice between the parties.

(b) If a potential violation of this section is discovered by the employer prior to an employee claiming a penalty under this section, the employer, within 90 days of the date of the discovery, may pay a self-imposed penalty in the amount of 10 percent of the amount of the payment unreasonably delayed or refused, along with the amount of the payment delayed or refused. This self-imposed penalty shall be in lieu of the penalty in subdivision (a).

(c) Upon the approval of a compromise and release, findings and awards, or stipulations and orders by the appeals board, it shall be conclusively presumed that any accrued claims for penalty have been resolved, regardless of whether a petition for penalty has been filed, unless the claim for penalty is expressly excluded by the terms of the order or award. Upon the submission of any issue for determination at a regular trial hearing, it shall be conclusively presumed that any accrued claim for penalty in connection with the benefit at issue has been resolved, regardless of whether a petition for penalty has been filed, unless the issue of penalty is also submitted or is expressly excluded in the statement of issues being submitted.

(d) The payment of any increased award pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be reduced by any amount paid under subdivision (d) of Section 4650 on the same unreasonably delayed or refused benefit payment.

(e) No unreasonable delay in the provision of medical treatment shall be found when the treatment has been authorized by the employer in a timely manner and the only dispute concerns payment of a billing submitted by a physician or medical provider as provided in Section 4603.2.

(f) Nothing in this section shall be construed to create a civil cause of action.

(g) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, no action may be brought to recover penalties that may be awarded under this section more than two years from the date the payment of compensation was due.

(h) This section shall apply to all injuries, without regard to whether the injury occurs before, on, or after the operative date of this section.

(i) This section shall become operative on June 1, 2004.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 42) and added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 34, Sec. 43.   Effective April 19, 2004.   Section operative June 1, 2004, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

5814.1.

When the payment of compensation has been unreasonably delayed or refused prior to the issuance of an award, and the director has provided discretionary compensation pursuant to Section 4903.3, the appeals board shall award to the director a penalty to be paid by the employer in the amount of 10 percent of the compensation so provided by the director, such penalty to be in addition to the penalty imposed by Section 5814. The question of delay and the reasonableness of the cause therefor shall be determined by the appeals board in accordance with the facts.

(History: Added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 894, Sec. 10.)
-------------------------------------------

5814.3.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 5814, when liability has been unreasonably rejected for claims of injury or illness as defined in Sections 3212 to 3213.2, inclusive, the amount of the penalty shall be five times the amount of the benefits unreasonably delayed due to the rejection of liability, but in no case shall the penalty exceed fifty thousand dollars ($50,000). The question of rejection and the reasonableness of the cause shall be determined by the appeals board in accordance with the facts.

(b) Penalties issued pursuant to this section shall be reported to the audit unit within the Division of Workers’ Compensation.

(c) This section shall apply to all injuries, without regard to whether the injury
 occurs before, on, or after the operative date of this section.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 5414.3 by Stats. 2023, Ch. 131, Sec. 145.   (AB 1754)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

5814.5.

When the payment of compensation has been unreasonably delayed or refused subsequent to the issuance of an award by an employer that has secured the payment of compensation pursuant to Section 3700, the appeals board shall, in addition to increasing the order, decision, or award pursuant to Section 5814, award reasonable attorneys’ fees incurred in enforcing the payment of compensation awarded.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 6, Sec. 82.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

5814.6.

(a) Any employer or insurer that knowingly violates Section 5814 with a frequency that indicates a general business practice is liable for administrative penalties of not to exceed four hundred thousand dollars ($400,000). Penalty payments shall be imposed by the administrative director and deposited into the Return-to-Work Fund established pursuant to Section 139.48.

(b) The administrative director may impose a penalty under either this section or subdivision (e) of Section 129.5.

(c) This section shall become operative on June 1, 2004.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 34, Sec. 44.   Effective April 19, 2004.   Section operative June 1, 2004, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

5815.

Every order, decision or award, other than an order merely appointing a trustee or guardian, shall contain a determination of all issues presented for determination by the appeals board prior thereto and not theretofore determined. Any issue not so determined will be deemed decided adversely as to the party in whose interest such issue was raised.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1513.)
-------------------------------------------

5816.

A determination of facts by the appeals board under this chapter has no collateral estoppel effect on a subsequent criminal prosecution and does not preclude litigation of those same facts in the criminal proceeding.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 158, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 7. Reconsideration and Judicial Review [5900. - 6002.]



  ARTICLE 1. Reconsideration [5900. - 5911.]

5900.

(a) Any person aggrieved directly or indirectly by any final order, decision, or award made and filed by the appeals board or a workers’ compensation judge under any provision contained in this division, may petition the appeals board for reconsideration in respect to any matters determined or covered by the final order, decision, or award, and specified in the petition for reconsideration. The petition shall be made only within the time and in the manner specified in this chapter.

(b) At any time within 60 days after the filing of an order, decision, or award made by a workers’ compensation judge and the accompanying report, the appeals board may, on its own motion, grant reconsideration.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 326, Sec. 27.)
-------------------------------------------

5901.

No cause of action arising out of any final order, decision or award made and filed by the appeals board or a workers’ compensation judge shall accrue in any court to any person until and unless the appeals board on its own motion sets aside the final order, decision, or award and removes the proceeding to itself or if the person files a petition for reconsideration, and the reconsideration is granted or denied. Nothing herein contained shall prevent the enforcement of any final order, decision, or award, in the manner provided in this division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 326, Sec. 28.)
-------------------------------------------

5902.

The petition for reconsideration shall set forth specifically and in full detail the grounds upon which the petitioner considers the final order, decision or award made and filed by the appeals board or a workers’ compensation judge to be unjust or unlawful, and every issue to be considered by the appeals board. The petition shall be verified upon oath in the manner required for verified pleadings in courts of record and shall contain a general statement of any evidence or other matters upon which the applicant relies in support thereof.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 326, Sec. 29.)
-------------------------------------------

5903.

At any time within 20 days after the service of any final order, decision, or award made and filed by the appeals board or a workers’ compensation judge granting or denying compensation, or arising out of or incidental thereto, any person aggrieved thereby may petition for reconsideration upon one or more of the following grounds and no other:

(a) That by the order, decision, or award made and filed by the appeals board or the workers’ compensation judge, the appeals board acted without or in excess of its powers.

(b) That the order, decision, or award was procured by fraud.

(c) That the evidence does not justify the findings of fact.

(d) That the petitioner has discovered new evidence material to him or her, which he or she could not, with reasonable diligence, have discovered and produced at the hearing.

(e) That the findings of fact do not support the order, decision, or award.

Nothing contained in this section shall limit the grant of continuing jurisdiction contained in Sections 5803 to 5805, inclusive.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 326, Sec. 30.)
-------------------------------------------

5904.

The petitioner for reconsideration shall be deemed to have finally waived all objections, irregularities, and illegalities concerning the matter upon which the reconsideration is sought other than those set forth in the petition for reconsideration.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1951, Ch. 778.)
-------------------------------------------

5905.

A copy of the petition for reconsideration shall be served forthwith upon all adverse parties by the person petitioning for reconsideration. Any adverse party may file an answer thereto within 10 days thereafter. Such answer shall likewise be verified. The appeals board may require the petition for reconsideration to be served on other persons designated by it.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1513.)
-------------------------------------------

5906.

Upon the filing of a petition for reconsideration, or having granted reconsideration upon its own motion, the appeals board may, with or without further proceedings and with or without notice affirm, rescind, alter, or amend the order, decision, or award made and filed by the appeals board or the workers’ compensation judge on the basis of the evidence previously submitted in the case, or may grant reconsideration and direct the taking of additional evidence. Notice of the time and place of any hearing on reconsideration shall be given to the petitioner and adverse parties and to other persons as the appeals board orders.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 326, Sec. 31.)
-------------------------------------------

5907.

If, at the time of granting reconsideration, it appears to the satisfaction of the appeals board that no sufficient reason exists for taking further testimony, the appeals board may affirm, rescind, alter, or amend the order, decision, or award made and filed by the appeals board or the workers’ compensation judge and may, without further proceedings, without notice, and without setting a time and place for further hearing, enter its findings, order, decision, or award based upon the record in the case.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 538, Sec. 492.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

5908.

(a) After the taking of additional evidence and a consideration of all of the facts the appeals board may affirm, rescind, alter, or amend the original order, decision, or award. An order, decision, or award made following reconsideration which affirms, rescinds, alters, or amends the original order, decision, or award shall be made by the appeals board but shall not affect any right or the enforcement of any right arising from or by virtue of the original order, decision, or award, unless so ordered by the appeals board.

(b) In any case where the appeals board rescinds or reduces an order, decision, or award on the grounds specified in paragraph (b) of Section 5903, the appeals board shall refer the case to the Bureau of Fraudulent Claims pursuant to Article 4 (commencing with Section 12990) of Chapter 2 of Division 3 of the Insurance Code, if the employer is insured, or to the district attorney of the county in which the fraud occurred if the employer is self-insured.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 892, Sec. 54.)
-------------------------------------------

5908.5.

Any decision of the appeals board granting or denying a petition for reconsideration or affirming, rescinding, altering, or amending the original findings, order, decision, or award following reconsideration shall be made by the appeals board and not by a workers’ compensation judge and shall be in writing, signed by a majority of the appeals board members assigned thereto, and shall state the evidence relied upon and specify in detail the reasons for the decision.

The requirements of this section shall in no way be construed so as to broaden the scope of judicial review as provided for in Article 2 (commencing with Section 5950) of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 326, Sec. 33.)
-------------------------------------------

5909.

(a) A petition for reconsideration is deemed to have been denied by the appeals board unless it is acted upon within 60 days from the date a trial judge transmits a case to the appeals board.

(b) (1) When a trial judge transmits a case to the appeals board, the trial judge shall provide notice to the parties of the case and the appeals board.

(2) For purposes of paragraph (1), service of the accompanying report, pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 5900, shall constitute providing notice.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 52, Sec. 27) by Stats. 2026, Ch. 83, Sec. 19.   (SB 171)   Effective July 13, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

5910.

The filing of a petition for reconsideration shall suspend for a period of 10 days the order, decision, or award affected, insofar as it applies to the parties to the petition, unless otherwise ordered by the appeals board. The appeals board upon the terms and conditions which it by order directs, may stay, suspend, or postpone the order, decision, or award during the pendency of the reconsideration.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1513.)
-------------------------------------------

5911.

Nothing contained in this article shall be construed to prevent the appeals board, on petition of an aggrieved party or on its own motion, from granting reconsideration of an original order, decision, or award made and filed by the appeals board within the same time specified for reconsideration of an original order, decision, or award.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1513.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Judicial Review [5950. - 5956.]

5950.

Any person affected by an order, decision, or award of the appeals board may, within the time limit specified in this section, apply to the Supreme Court or to the court of appeal for the appellate district in which he resides, for a writ of review, for the purpose of inquiring into and determining the lawfulness of the original order, decision, or award or of the order, decision, or award following reconsideration. The application for writ of review must be made within 45 days after a petition for reconsideration is denied, or, if a petition is granted or reconsideration is had on the appeal board’s own motion, within 45 days after the filing of the order, decision, or award following reconsideration.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 661.)
-------------------------------------------

5951.

The writ of review shall be made returnable at a time and place then or thereafter specified by court order and shall direct the appeals board to certify its record in the case to the court within the time therein specified. No new or additional evidence shall be introduced in such court, but the cause shall be heard on the record of the appeals board, as certified to by it.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1513.)
-------------------------------------------

5952.

The review by the court shall not be extended further than to determine, based upon the entire record which shall be certified by the appeals board, whether:

(a) The appeals board acted without or in excess of its powers.

(b) The order, decision, or award was procured by fraud.

(c) The order, decision, or award was unreasonable.

(d) The order, decision, or award was not supported by substantial evidence. 

(e) If findings of fact are made, such findings of fact support the order, decision, or award under review.

Nothing in this section shall permit the court to hold a trial de novo, to take evidence, or to exercise its independent judgment on the evidence.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1513.)
-------------------------------------------

5953.

The findings and conclusions of the appeals board on questions of fact are conclusive and final and are not subject to review. Such questions of fact shall include ultimate facts and the findings and conclusions of the appeals board. The appeals board and each party to the action or proceeding before the appeals board shall have the right to appear in the review proceeding. Upon the hearing, the court shall enter judgment either affirming or annulling the order, decision, or award, or the court may remand the case for further proceedings before the appeals board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1513.)
-------------------------------------------

5954.

The provisions of the Code of Civil Procedure relating to writs of review shall, so far as applicable, apply to proceedings in the courts under the provisions of this article. A copy of every pleading filed pursuant to the terms of this article shall be served on the appeals board and upon every party who entered an appearance in the action before the appeals board and whose interest therein is adverse to the party filing such pleading.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1513.)
-------------------------------------------

5955.

No court of this state, except the Supreme Court and the courts of appeal to the extent herein specified, has jurisdiction to review, reverse, correct, or annul any order, rule, decision, or award of the appeals board, or to suspend or delay the operation or execution thereof, or to restrain, enjoin, or interfere with the appeals board in the performance of its duties but a writ of mandate shall lie from the Supreme Court or a court of appeal in all proper cases.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1967, Ch. 17.)
-------------------------------------------

5956.

The filing of a petition for, or the pendency of, a writ of review shall not of itself stay or suspend the operation of any order, rule, decision, or award of the appeals board, but the court before which the petition is filed may stay or suspend, in whole or in part, the operation of the order, decision, or award of the appeals board subject to review, upon the terms and conditions which it by order directs, except as provided in Article 3 of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1513.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Undertaking on Stay Order [6000. - 6002.]

6000.

The operation of any order, decision, or award of the appeals board under the provisions of this division or any judgment entered thereon, shall not at any time be stayed by the court to which petition is made for a writ of review, unless an undertaking is executed on the part of the petitioner.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 517, Sec. 310.)
-------------------------------------------

6001.

The undertaking shall provide that:

(a) The petitioner and sureties are bound in double the amount named in such order, decision, or award.

(b) If the order, decision, or award appealed from, or any part thereof, is affirmed, or the proceeding upon review is dismissed, the petitioner will pay the amount directed to be paid by the order, decision, or award or the part of such amount as to which the order, decision, or award is affirmed, and all damages and costs which are awarded against the petitioner.

(c) If the petitioner does not make such payment within 30 days after the filing with the appeals board of the remittitur from the reviewing court, judgment in favor of the adverse party may be entered on motion of the adverse party, and the undertaking shall apply to any judgment entered thereon. Such judgment may be entered in any superior court in which a certified copy of the order, decision, or award is filed, against the sureties for such amount, together with interest that is due thereon, and the damages and costs which are awarded against the petitioner. The provisions of the Code of Civil Procedure, except insofar as they are inconsistent with this division, are applicable to the undertaking.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1513.)
-------------------------------------------

6002.

The undertaking shall be filed with the appeals board. The certificate of the appeals board, or any proper officer thereof, of the filing and approval of such undertaking, is sufficient evidence of the compliance of the petitioner with the provisions of this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1513.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 4.5. WORKERS' COMPENSATION AND INSURANCE: STATE EMPLOYEES NOT OTHERWISE COVERED [6100. - 6149.]



CHAPTER 1. General Provisions [6100. - 6101.]

6100.
